District of Columbia statutes.
47-2883.07

Severability.

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or the application of this part which can be effected without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

Sept. 6, 1960, 74 Stat. 816, Pub. L. 86-715, § 7
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-507.
1973 Ed., § 2-2307.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.